District of Columbia statutes.
1-909.08

Criminal penalties.

Whoever willfully violates any provision of any section of this subchapter (other than § 1-909.06), or any regulation or order issued under those provisions, shall be fined not more than $5,000, or imprisoned not more than one year, or both, except that for a violation by a person not an individual, the person shall be fined not more than $100,000.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 148, 45 DCR 4045
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 113(b), 47 DCR 520

History

1981 Ed., § 1-785.8.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-91 substituted “this subchapter (other than § 1-785.6)” for “subchapter IV of this chapter (other than section 136)”.

Effect of Amendments

Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.

Editor's Notes